Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4078.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2026 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 317.
SECTION 2. (1) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income any amount re-
ceived in judgment or settlement of a civil action arising from a wildfire, as defined in ORS
477.089, and awarded to a plaintiff.
(2) A subtraction under this section is allowed only for resolution of civil actions arising
from a wildfire that:
(a) Is the subject of a state of emergency declared by the Governor;
(b) Occurs in an area subject to an executive order of the Governor invoking the Emer-
gency Conflagration Act under ORS 476.510 to 476.610; or
(c) Is a federally declared disaster, as defined in section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code,
whether located within Oregon or elsewhere.
(3) A subtraction under this section:
(a) Is not allowed for any amount described in subsection (1) of this section that is taken
into account as a deduction or credit on the taxpayer’s federal income tax return for any tax
year; and
(b) Is allowed only to the extent that losses, expenses or other damages compensated by
the amount of the judgment or settlement are not compensated for by insurance or other-
wise.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section:
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 70

HB 4078
(a) “Wildfire” means a wildfire as defined in ORS 477.089, that:
(A) Is the subject of a state of emergency declared by the Governor;
(B) Occurs in an area subject to an executive order of the Governor invoking the Emer-
gency Conflagration Act under ORS 476.510 to 476.610; or
(C) Is a federally declared disaster, as defined in section 165 of the Internal Revenue
Code, whether located within Oregon or elsewhere.
(b) “Wildfire-related litigation” means litigation through which a plaintiff seeks compen-
sation for losses, expenses or damages found to be caused by a wildfire.
(2) There may be subtracted from federal taxable income any amount of legal fees in-
curred by a plaintiff in wildfire-related litigation that is not otherwise allowed as a deduction
to the taxpayer, as incurred in the tax year by the taxpayer.
(3) A subtraction under this section is allowed regardless of whether the taxpayer elects
to deduct itemized deductions on the taxpayer’s federal or state return.
SECTION 4. Sections 5 and 6 of this 2026 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 318.
SECTION 5. (1) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income any amount re-
ceived in judgment or settlement of a civil action arising from a wildfire, as defined in ORS
477.089, and awarded to a plaintiff.
(2) A subtraction under this section is allowed only for resolution of civil actions arising
from a wildfire that:
(a) Is the subject of a state of emergency declared by the Governor;
(b) Occurs in an area subject to an executive order of the Governor invoking the Emer-
gency Conflagration Act under ORS 476.510 to 476.610; or
(c) Is a federally declared disaster, as defined in section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code,
whether located within Oregon or elsewhere.
(3) A subtraction under this section:
(a) Is not allowed for any amount described in subsection (1) of this section that is taken
into account as a deduction or credit on the taxpayer’s federal income tax return for any tax
year; and
(b) Is allowed only to the extent that losses, expenses or other damages compensated by
the amount of the judgment or settlement are not compensated for by insurance or other-
wise.
SECTION 6. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Wildfire” means a wildfire, as defined in ORS 477.089, that:
(A) Is the subject of a state of emergency declared by the Governor;
(B) Occurs in an area subject to an executive order of the Governor invoking the Emer-
gency Conflagration Act under ORS 476.510 to 476.610; or
(C) Is a federally declared disaster, as defined in section 165 of the Internal Revenue
Code, whether located within Oregon or elsewhere.
(b) “Wildfire-related litigation” means litigation through which a plaintiff seeks compen-
sation for losses, expenses or damages found to be caused by a wildfire.
(2) There may be subtracted from federal taxable income any amount of legal fees in-
curred by a plaintiff in wildfire-related litigation that is not otherwise allowed as a deduction
to the taxpayer, as incurred in the tax year by the taxpayer.
(3) A subtraction under this section is allowed regardless of whether the taxpayer elects
[2]

HB 4078
to deduct itemized deductions on the taxpayer’s federal or state return.
SECTION 7. (1) Sections 2 and 5 of this 2026 Act apply to declarations and executive or-
ders issued on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2027, and, notwithstanding ORS
315.037, to amounts received in all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2018.
(2) Sections 3 and 6 of this 2026 Act apply to:
(a) Declarations and executive orders issued on or after January 1, 2018, and before
January 1, 2027; and
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 315.037, losses incurred and legal fees paid or incurred in all tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2018.
SECTION 8. (1) Any taxpayer who seeks refunds due to exemption of amounts from
taxation as provided in section 2 or 3 of this 2026 Act, as applicable to tax years beginning
on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2024, shall file an amended return for the
applicable tax year.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 314.415 (2), a taxpayer may file a claim for a refund described
in subsection (1) of this section at any time prior to May 15, 2029.
(3) A refund described in this section does not bear interest under ORS 305.220.
SECTION 9. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

[3]